en: Grease Guns
xx: Grease Guns
cs: Mazací pistole
da: Smørepistoler
de: Fettpressen
es: Pistolas de engrase
fr: Pompes à graisse
it: Pistole lubrificanti
ja: グリースガン
nl: Vetspuiten
no: Fettpresser
pl: Smarownice
pt: Pistolas de graxa
ru: Смазочные пистолеты
sv: Fettsprutor
tr: Yağ Tabancaları

en: Grinders
xx: Grinders
cs: Brusky
da: Slibemaskiner
de: Schleifmaschinen
es: Esmeriladoras
fr: Meuleuses, Disqueuse
it: Molatrici
ja: グラインダー
nl: Slijpers
no: Kverner
pl: Młynki
pt: Esmerilhadeiras
ru: Точильные камни
sv: Kapmaskiner
tr: Taşlama Makineleri

en: Grips
xx: Grips
cs: Svěrací kleště
da: Greb
de: Griffe
es: Empuñadura/mango
fr: Poignées
it: Pinze manuali
ja: グリップ
nl: Handgrepen
no: Grep
pl: Uchwyty
pt: Garras
ru: Зажимы
sv: Grepp
tr: Saplar

en: Hammers
xx: Hammers
cs: Zatloukání
da: Hammere
de: Hämmer
es: Martillos y mazos
fr: Marteaux
it: Martelli
ja: ハンマー・電動ハンマー
nl: Timmeren
no: Hammere
pl: Wbijanie
pt: Marteladores
ru: Молотки
sv: Hammare
tr: Çekiçler

en: Manual Hammers
xx: Manual Hammers
cs: Ruční kladiva
da: Håndhammere
de: Manuelle Hämmer
es: Martillos
fr: Marteaux à main
it: Martelli manuali
ja: ハンマー
nl: Hamers
no: Manuelle hammere
pl: Młotki
pt: Martelos
ru: Ручные молотки
sv: Handhammare
tr: El Çekiçleri

en: Powered Hammers
xx: Powered Hammers
cs: Pneumatická kladiva
da: Nedbrydningshamre
de: Maschinenbetriebene Hämmer
es: Martillos eléctricos
fr: Marteaux électriques
it: Martelli a batteria
ja: 電動ハンマー類
nl: Mechanische hamers
no: Elektriske hammere
pl: Młoty mechaniczne
pt: Martelos elétricos
ru: Механические молотки
sv: Elektriska hammare
tr: Elektrikli Çekiçler

en: Handheld Power Mixers
xx: Handheld Power Mixers
cs: Elektrické míchače
da: Håndholdt cement- og malingsblander
de: Handmischmaschinen
es: Mezcladoras de mano motorizadas
fr: Mélangeurs portatifs
it: Miscelatori manuali
ja: 撹拌機
nl: Electrische handmengers
no: Håndholdte blandere til maling/reparasjonsmasse
pl: Mieszarki ręczne
pt: Mixer de mão
ru: Ручные электрические мешалки
sv: Mixerstavar
tr: Motorlu El Karıştırıcıları

en: Hardware Torches
xx: Hardware Torches
cs: Hořáky
da: Fakler
de: Arbeitslampen
es: Sopletes
fr: Chalumeaux
it: Torce
ja: トーチ・バーナー
nl: Zaklampen
no: Blåselamper
pl: Palniki
pt: Tochas de soldagem
ru: Горелки
sv: Ficklampor
tr: Üfleçler

en: Heat Guns
xx: Heat Guns
cs: Horkovzdušné pistole
da: Varmepistoler
de: Heißluftpistole
es: Pistolas de aire caliente
fr: Pistolets thermiques
it: Pistole termiche
ja: ヒートガン
nl: Hittepistolen
no: Varmepistoler
pl: Opalarki
pt: Sopradores térmicos
ru: Строительные фены
sv: Värmepistoler
tr: Isı Tabancaları

en: Impact Wrenches & Drivers
xx: Impact Wrenches & Drivers
cs: Rázové utahováky
da: Slagskruenøgler
de: Schlagschrauber
es: Taladradores y llaves de impacto
fr: Clés et tournevis à chocs
it: Avvitatori a impulsi
ja: インパクトレンチ・インパクトドライバー
nl: Slagmoersleutels
no: Slagnøkler og drivere
pl: Wkrętarki udarowe
pt: Chaves inglesas e de impacto
ru: Ударные гайковерты и отвертки
sv: Slagskruvdragare
tr: Darbeli Anahtar ve Vidalamalar

en: Industrial Vibrators
xx: Industrial Vibrators
cs: Průmyslové vibrační stroje
da: Vibratorer til industribrug
de: Industrievibratoren
es: Vibradores industriales
fr: Vibrateurs industriels
it: Vibratori per industria
ja: 工業用振動モーター
nl: Industriële vibreermachines
no: Industrivibratorer
pl: Wibratory przemysłowe
pt: Vibradores industriais
ru: Промышленные вибраторы
sv: Industriella vibratorer
tr: Endüstriyel Vibratörler

en: Inspection Mirrors
xx: Inspection Mirrors
cs: Inspekční zrcátka
da: Inspektionsspejle
de: Kontrollspiegel
es: Espejos de inspección
fr: Miroirs d'inspection
it: Specchi di ispezione
ja: 点検ミラー
nl: Inspectiespiegels
no: Inspeksjonsspeil
pl: Lusterka inspekcyjne
pt: Espelhos de inspeção
ru: Зеркала для осмотра
sv: Inspektionsspeglar
tr: İnceleme Aynaları

en: Ladders & Scaffolding
xx: Ladders & Scaffolding
cs: Žebříky a lešení
da: Stiger og stilladser
de: Leitern & Gerüste
es: Escaleras y andamios
fr: Échelles et échafaudages
it: Scale e ponteggi
ja: はしご・足場
nl: Ladders en bouwsteigers
no: Stiger og stillaser
pl: Drabiny i rusztowania
pt: Escadas e andaimes
ru: Лестницы и строительные леса
sv: Stegar och plattformar
tr: Merdivenler ve Yapı İskeleleri

en: Ladder Carts
xx: Ladder Carts
cs: Vozíky se stupátky
da: Stigevogne
de: Leiterwagen
es: Escaleras sobre ruedas
fr: Escabeaux roulants, Escabeau solidaire d'un meuble
it: Carrelli con scale
ja: はしごカート
nl: Ladderwagens
no: Vognstiger
pl: Drabinowe schody jezdne
pt: Escadas com rodinhas
ru: Передвижные стремянки
sv: Stegvagnar
tr: Tekerlekli Merdivenler

en: Ladders
xx: Ladders
cs: Žebříky
da: Stiger
de: Leitern
es: Escaleras de mano
fr: Échelles
it: Scale
ja: はしご
nl: Ladders
no: Stiger
pl: Drabiny
pt: Escadas de mão
ru: Лестницы
sv: Stegar
tr: Taşınır Merdivenler

en: Scaffolding
xx: Scaffolding
cs: Lešení
da: Stilladser
de: Gerüste
es: Andamiaje
fr: Échafaudages
it: Ponteggi
ja: 足場
nl: Bouwsteigers
no: Stillaser
pl: Rusztowania
pt: Andaimes
ru: Строительные леса
sv: Plattformar
tr: Yapı İskeleleri

en: Step Stools
xx: Step Stools
cs: Stoličky
da: Trappestole
de: Tritthocker
es: Taburetes escaleras
fr: Tabourets-escabeaux
it: Sgabelli a gradini
ja: 踏み台・ステップ
nl: Keukentrapjes
no: Trappestoler
pl: Podesty
pt: Banquinhos de apoio
ru: Табуреты-стремянки
sv: Trappstolar
tr: Basamaklı Tabureler

en: Work Platforms
xx: Work Platforms
cs: Pracovní plošiny
da: Arbejdsplatforme
de: Arbeitsplattformen
es: Plataformas de trabajo
fr: Plateformes de travail
it: Piattaforme di lavoro
ja: 作業足場
nl: Steigers
no: Arbeidsplattformer
pl: Platformy robocze
pt: Plataformas de trabalho
ru: Рабочие помосты
sv: Arbetsplattformar
tr: Çalışma Platformları

en: Lathes
xx: Lathes
cs: Soustruhy
da: Drejebænke
de: Drehmaschinen
es: Tornos
fr: Tours fraiseuses
it: Torni
ja: 旋盤
nl: Draaibanken
no: Dreiebenker
pl: Tokarki
pt: Tornos
ru: Токарные станки
sv: Svarvar
tr: Torna Tezgahları

en: Light Bulb Changers
xx: Light Bulb Changers
cs: Vyměňovače žárovek
da: Pæreskiftere
de: Glühbirnenwechsler
es: Cambiadores de bombillas
fr: Changeurs d'ampoules
it: Strumenti cambio lampadine
ja: ランプチェンジャー
nl: Gloeilampverwisselaars
no: Lyspærebyttere
pl: Zmieniacze żarówek
pt: Trocadores de lâmpadas
ru: Устройства для замены лампочек
sv: Glödlampsbytare
tr: Ampul Değiştiriciler